Maryland, session 2025, HB0360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 597 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.2.
A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION REGISTRY AND PAY ANY
FEES AS REQUIRED UNDER § 14–131 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
Article – Real Property
11–109.5.
A CONDOMINIUM IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL REGISTER WITH THE
COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION REGISTRY AND PAY ANY FEES AS REQUIRED UNDER §
14–131 OF THIS ARTICLE.
11B–112.4.
A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL
REGISTER WITH THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION REGISTRY AND PAY ANY FEES AS
REQUIRED UNDER § 14–131 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–131.
(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community association” means:
(i) A condominium council of unit owners organized under Title 11,
Subtitle 1 of this article;
(ii) A homeowners association organized under Title 11B of this
article; or
(iii) A cooperative housing corporation organized under Title 5,
Subtitle 6B of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) “Community association management” means to manage the common
property and services of a community association with the authority of the community
association in its business, legal, financial, or other transactions with association members
and nonmembers for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, including:
(i) Collecting monthly assessments;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 597
(ii) Preparing budgets, financial statements, or other financial
reports;
(iii) Negotiating contracts or otherwise coordinating or arranging for
services or the purchase of property or goods for or on behalf of a community association;
(iv) Executing the resolutions and decisions of a community
association and assisting the governing body of a community association and association
members in complying with laws, contracts, covenants, rules, and bylaws;
(v) Managing the operation and maintenance of community–owned
properties, including community centers, pools, golf courses, and parking areas; and
(vi) Arranging, conducting, or coordinating meetings of a community
association or the governing body of an association.
(4) “Office” means the Prince George’s County Office of Community
Relations.
(5) “OWNER” MEANS:
(I) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION;
(II) A UNIT OWNER OF A CONDOMINIUM; OR
(III) A LOT OWNER OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(6) “Registry” means the Community Association Managers Registry.
(b) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.
(c) On or after January 1, 2011, the Office shall establish a Registry.
(d) (1) Any entity, including a sole proprietorship, that provides community
association management services for community associations located in the county shall
register with the Registry and renew its registration by January 31 of each year.
(2) EACH COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION LOCATED IN THE COUNTY SHALL
REGISTER WITH THE REGISTRY AND RENEW ITS REGISTRATION BY JANUARY 31
EACH YEAR.
(e) (1) The Office shall:
(i) Provide the registration form; and
(ii) Collect a fee from each entity that registers under this section.
– 3 –

Ch. 597 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (I) The COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL ESTABLISH THE annual fee
charged, WHICH shall be set at $100 IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO FUND THE COST
TO ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER THE ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS BY THE
OFFICE.
(II) THE FEE MAY INCLUDE:
1. A PER–UNIT CHARGE TO COMMUNITY ASSOCIATIONS
TO RENEW REGISTRATION;
2. FEES FOR SERVICES RELATING TO THE
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS THAT SEEK TO RECOVER THE ACTUAL COST OF
THE SERVICES; AND
3. A PER–UNIT CHARGE TO DEVELOPERS WHEN THE
DOCUMENTS FOR THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION ARE RECORDED.
(II) (III) FEES COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE COST OF ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE
RESOLUTION THE ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS PROVIDED THROUGH THE
COUNTY FOR DISPUTES BETWEEN A COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION AND AN OWNER,
INCLUDING COSTS FOR ANY TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED BY THE OFFICE AND
THE COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(f) The registration form shall include:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the entity providing
community association management services IF APPLICABLE;
(2) The names, titles, and business telephone numbers of the principal
officers of the entity;
(3) The designated contact person of the entity, including name, address,
title, telephone number, and electronic mail address;
(4) The length of time the entity has been in existence and the length of
time the entity has provided community association management services; and
(5) A listing of all community associations in the county as of December 31
of the previous year for which the entity provided community association management
services.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 597
(G) IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY
ESTABLISH THE FOLLOWING REASONABLE FEES IN AMOUNTS SUFFICIENT TO COVER
COSTS IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (E)(2)(III) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) FEES FOR SERVICES RELATING TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARING PROCESS THAT SEEK TO RECOVER THE ACTUAL COST OF THE SERVICES;
AND
(2) A PER–UNIT CHARGE TO DEVELOPERS WHEN DOCUMENTS ARE
RECORDED.
(H) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION SHALL BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
[(g)] (I) The Office may make any information received under this section
available to the public, subject to the provisions of the Maryland Public Information Act.
(J) A PERSON WHO FAILS TO REGISTER OR WHO MAKES A FALSE
STATEMENT ON A REGISTRATION FORM MAY NOT FILE A DISPUTE UNDER THE
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS PROCESS PROVIDED THROUGH THE COUNTY UNTIL
THE PERSON REGISTERS AS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(h)] (K) A person who commits a willful violation of this section or who causes
a person to commit a willful violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –